Massachusetts, session 194th, H4252.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (B) of section 2 of chapter 488 of the acts of 1989 is hereby amended by
striking clause (5) and inserting in place thereof the follow clause:-
"(5) The level of any exaction shall be reviewed at least every 10 years and reset as
required based upon the recommendation of the office of community development and the mayor
of said city. In between reviews, updates to any exaction may be adjusted, over time, based upon
changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers compiled by the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics."
of 1